Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3312
Reciprocal application.

Sections 77-3301 to 77-3316 shall apply only to cases in which each of the states involved has a law identical with or substantially similar to sections 77-3301 to 77-3316.

Laws 1976, LB 584, § 12.